Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1420XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1420XD (2) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 43.49, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
On the Monday or Tuesday following the primary election, the
board of supervisors shall meet, open, and canvass the returns
from each voting precinct in the county, and make abstracts
thereof, stating the following:
Sec. 2. Section 43.56, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, and c,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
a. One person or two designees, according to the population
of the county as provided in section 50.48, subsection 3,
paragraph “a”, chosen by the candidate requesting the recount,
who shall be named in the written request when the request is
filed.
b. One person or two designees, according to the population
of the county as provided in section 50.48, subsection 3,
paragraph “a”, chosen by the candidate who received the highest
number of votes for the nomination being recounted at or before
the time the board is required to convene. However, if the
candidate who requested the recount received more votes than
anyone else for the nomination, the candidate who received the
second highest number of votes shall designate this person
choose the designee or designees, as applicable, to serve on
the recount board.
c. A third person mutually agreeable to the board members
designated by the candidates One or three persons, according
to the population of the county as provided in section
50.48, subsection 3, paragraph “a”, who are precinct election
officials selected by the chief judge of the judicial district
in which the canvass occurs at or before the time the board is
required to convene.
Sec. 3. Section 46.24, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A judge of the supreme court, court of appeals, or
district court including a district associate judge, full-time
associate juvenile judge, or full-time associate probate judge,
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
or a clerk of the district court must receive more affirmative
than negative votes to be retained in office. When the poll
is closed, the election judges shall publicly canvass the vote
forthwith. The board of supervisors shall canvass the returns
on the Monday or Tuesday after the election, and shall promptly
certify the number of affirmative and negative votes on each
judge or clerk to the state commissioner of elections.
Sec. 4. Section 47.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 9. The state commissioner may, at the state
commissioner’s discretion, call for a recount of any election
and advise recount boards convened pursuant to chapter 50.
Sec. 5. Section 50.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
50.12 Return and preservation of ballots.
Immediately after making the proclamation, and before
separating, the board members of each precinct in which votes
have been received by paper ballot shall enclose in an envelope
or other container all ballots which have been counted by them,
except those endorsed “Rejected as double”, “Defective”, or
“Objected to”, and securely seal the envelope. The signatures
of all board members of the precinct shall be placed across
the seal or the opening of the container so that it cannot
be opened without breaking the seal. The precinct election
officials shall return all the ballots to the commissioner,
who shall carefully preserve them for six months. Ballots
from elections for federal offices shall be preserved for
twenty-two months. The sealed packages containing voted
ballots shall be opened only for an official recount authorized
by section 50.48, or 50.49, or 50.50, for an election contest
held pursuant to chapters 57 through 62, to conduct an audit
pursuant to section 50.50 or 50.51, or to destroy the ballots
pursuant to section 50.19.
Sec. 6. Section 50.21, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-2- ss/ns 2/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. The commissioner shall reconvene the election board of
the special precinct established by section 53.20 not earlier
than noon on the second day following each election which
is required by law to be canvassed on the Monday or Tuesday
following the election. If the second day following such an
election is a legal holiday the special precinct election board
may be convened at noon on the day following the election, and
if the canvass of the election is scheduled at any time earlier
than the Monday Tuesday following the election, the special
precinct election board shall be reconvened at noon on the day
following the election.
Sec. 7. Section 50.24, subsections 1 and 4, Code 2025, are
amended to read as follows:
1. The county board of supervisors shall meet to canvass
the vote on the first Monday or Tuesday after the day of
each election to which this chapter is applicable, unless
the law authorizing the election specifies another date for
the canvass. If that Monday or Tuesday is a public holiday,
section 4.1, subsection 34, controls.
4. For a regular or special city election or a city runoff
election, if the city is located in more than one county, the
controlling commissioner for that city under section 47.2 shall
conduct a second canvass on the second Monday or Tuesday after
the day of the election. However, if a recount is requested
pursuant to section 50.48, the controlling commissioner shall
conduct the second canvass within two business days after the
conclusion of the recount proceedings. Each commissioner
conducting a canvass for the city pursuant to subsection 1
shall transmit abstracts for the offices and public measures of
that city to the controlling commissioner for that city, along
with individual tallies for each write-in candidate. At the
second canvass, the county board of supervisors of the county
of the controlling commissioner shall canvass the abstracts
received pursuant to this subsection and shall prepare a
combined city abstract stating the number of votes cast in the
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-3- ss/ns 3/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
city for each office and on each question on the ballot for
the city election. The combined city abstract shall further
indicate the name of each person who received votes for each
office on the ballot, the number of votes each person named
received for that office, and the number of votes for and
against each question submitted to the voters at the election.
The votes of all write-in candidates who each received less
than five percent of the total votes cast in the city for
an office shall be reported collectively under the heading
“scattering”.
Sec. 8. Section 50.24, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
a. For a regular or special school election, if the school
district is located in more than one county, the controlling
commissioner for that school district under section 47.2 shall
conduct a second canvass on the second Monday or Tuesday after
the day of election. However, if a recount is requested
pursuant to section 50.48, the controlling commissioner shall
conduct the second canvass within two business days after the
conclusion of the recount proceedings. Each commissioner
conducting a canvass for the school district pursuant to
subsection 1 shall transmit abstracts for the offices and
public measures of that school district to the controlling
commissioner for that school district, along with individual
tallies for each write-in candidate. At the second canvass the
county board of supervisors of the controlling county shall
canvass the abstracts received pursuant to this subsection and
shall prepare a combined school district abstract stating the
number of votes cast in the school district for each office and
on each question on the ballot for the school election. The
combined school district abstract shall further indicate the
name of each person who received votes for each office on the
ballot, the number of votes each person named received for that
office, and the number of votes for and against each question
submitted to the voters at the election. The votes of all
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-4- ss/ns 4/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
write-in candidates who each received less than five percent of
the total votes cast in the school district for an office shall
be reported collectively under the heading “scattering”.
Sec. 9. Section 50.48, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. a. The Except as provided in paragraph “b”, the county
board of canvassers shall order a recount of the votes cast for
a particular office or nomination in one or more all specified
election precincts in that county if a written request for a
recount is made filed with the commissioner of that county not
later than 5:00 p.m. on the third second day following the
county board’s canvass of the election in question. For a city
runoff election held pursuant to section 376.9, the written
request must be made filed with the commissioner of that county
not later than 5:00 p.m. on the day following the county
board’s canvass of the city runoff election. The request shall
be filed with the commissioner of that county and shall be
signed by either of the following:
(1) A candidate for that office or nomination whose name was
printed on the ballot of the precinct or precincts where the
recount is requested.
(2) Any other person who receives votes for that particular
office or nomination in the precinct or precincts where the
recount is requested and who is legally qualified to seek and
to hold the office in question.
b. The state commissioner shall order a recount of the
votes cast for a statewide office, a seat in the United States
Congress, or electors for president or vice president, or
nominations for such offices, in each county specified in a
written request if a written request for a recount is filed
with the state commissioner not later than 5:00 p.m. on the
second day following the county canvass of the election in
question.
c. If automatic tabulating equipment was used to tabulate
votes in the precinct, a written request for a recount must
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-5- ss/ns 5/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
indicate whether the recount shall be conducted only using
automated tabulating equipment or by a hand recount. The same
method of recounting must be requested and used in each county
in which the candidate requests a recount. The request must be
filed with the commissioner of the county where the candidate
is requesting a recount and must be signed by either of the
following:
(1) A candidate for that office or nomination whose name
was printed on a ballot of the precinct where the recount is
requested.
(2) Any other person who receives votes for that particular
office or nomination in the precinct where the recount is
requested and who is legally qualified to seek and to hold the
office in question.
b. d. Immediately upon receipt of a request for a recount
under paragraph “a”, the commissioner shall send a copy of the
request to the apparent winner by certified mail and the state
commissioner by electronic mail. Immediately upon receipt
of a request for a recount under paragraph “b”, the state
commissioner shall send a copy of the request to the apparent
winner by certified mail and the commissioner of each county
specified in the request by electronic mail. The commissioner
or state commissioner who initially received the request for a
recount shall also attempt to contact the apparent winner by
telephone. If the apparent winner cannot be reached within
four three days, the chairperson of the political party or
organization which nominated the apparent winner shall be
contacted and shall act on behalf of the apparent winner,
if necessary. For candidates for state or federal offices,
the chairperson of the state party shall be contacted. For
candidates for county offices, the county chairperson of the
party shall be contacted.
e. Upon completion of an administrative audit, a candidate
who submitted a request for a recount may withdraw the request
within twenty-four hours.
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-6- ss/ns 6/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 10. Section 50.48, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. c. (1) Upon receipt of a written request
for a hand recount involving a state office, including a seat
in the general assembly, a seat in the United States Congress,
or electors for president or vice president, forwarded by
the commissioner, the state commissioner shall verify that
each request for a recount for that office submitted by that
candidate included a request for a hand recount. For each
request that did not include a request for a hand recount, the
state commissioner shall assess a civil penalty of one hundred
dollars against the candidate, to be deposited in the general
fund of the state. The civil penalty shall first be deducted
from the bond filed by the candidate.
(2) Upon verification that a candidate for a state office,
including a seat in the general assembly, a seat in the United
States Congress, or electors for president or vice president,
submitted a written request for a hand recount in at least one
but not all counties, the state commissioner shall, within six
days following the county canvass of the election, inform each
commissioner to which a hand recount was not requested that a
hand recount shall be performed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 11. Section 50.48, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025,
are amended by striking the subsections and inserting in lieu
thereof the following:
3. a. The recount shall be conducted by a board which shall
consist of one of the following:
(1) For a county with a population of fewer than fifteen
thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census,
all of the following:
(a) A designee of the candidate requesting the recount,
who shall be named in the written request when the request is
filed.
(b) A designee of the apparent winning candidate, who shall
be named by the candidate at or before the time the board is
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-7- ss/ns 7/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
required to convene.
(c) A member who is a precinct election official selected by
the chief judge of the judicial district in which the canvass
occurs at or before the time the board is required to convene.
(2) For a county with a population of at least fifteen
thousand but fewer than fifty thousand according to the most
recent federal decennial census, all of the following:
(a) A designee of the candidate requesting the recount,
who shall be named in the written request when the request is
filed.
(b) A designee of the apparent winning candidate, who shall
be named by the candidate at or before the time the board is
required to convene.
(c) Three members who are precinct election officials
selected by the chief judge of the judicial district in which
the canvass occurs at or before the time the board is required
to convene.
(3) For a county with a population of fifty thousand or
greater, all of the following:
(a) Two designees of the candidate requesting the recount,
who shall be named in the written request when the request is
filed.
(b) Two designees of the apparent winning candidate, who
shall be named by the candidate at or before the time the board
is required to convene.
(c) Three members who are precinct election officials
selected by the chief judge of the judicial district in which
the canvass occurs at or before the time the board is required
to convene.
b. Members appointed to the recount board by the chief judge
shall be selected consistent with section 49.13, subsection 2,
for partisan offices and section 49.12 for nonpartisan offices.
c. The commissioner shall convene the persons designated
under paragraph “a” not later than 9:00 a.m. on the sixth
day following the county board’s canvass of the election in
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-8- ss/ns 8/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
question.
4. When all members of the recount board have been selected,
the board shall undertake and complete the required recount as
expeditiously as reasonably possible in the following manner:
a. The commissioner shall inform the board whether the
candidate has requested a hand recount. The commissioner
or the commissioner’s designee shall supervise the handling
of ballots to ensure that the ballots are protected from
alteration or damage.
b. The board shall direct the commissioner to retabulate
the ballots using the automatic tabulating equipment. The same
program used for tabulating the votes on election day shall be
used at the recount unless the program is believed or known to
be flawed.
c. The board shall recount only the ballots which were voted
and counted for the office in question, including any disputed
ballots returned as required in section 50.5.
d. After retabulating the ballots as provided in paragraph
“b”, the board shall compare the printed results of the
tabulation equipment to the abstract prepared pursuant to the
county board’s canvass. The board shall note any discrepancies
between the two results.
e. If the candidate’s written request included a request
for a hand recount, the board shall separate the ballots into
piles: one for each candidate, one for write-in votes, and
one for ballots considered an over or under count. The board
shall review and tabulate the ballots in each pile as provided
in section 49.98. The board shall compare the hand recount
results to the printed results of the tabulation equipment and
the abstract. If there are discrepancies between the three
results, then the results of the hand recount shall control.
f. The ballots shall be resealed by the recount board before
adjournment and shall be preserved as required by section
50.12.
Sec. 12. Section 50.48, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-9- ss/ns 9/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. 0b. The recount board shall complete the
recount and file its report as follows:
(1) For the offices of president and vice president, not
later than the seventeenth day following the county board’s
canvass of the election in question.
(2) For a state office, including a seat in the general
assembly, or a seat in the United States Congress, not later
than the twenty-first day following the county board’s canvass
of the election in question.
(3) For any other office, not later than the thirteenth
day following the county board’s canvass of the election in
question.
Sec. 13. Section 50.48, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
6. a. The commissioner shall promptly notify the state
commissioner of any recount of votes for an office to which
section 50.30, or section 43.60 in the case of a primary
election, is applicable, or any other office elected by the
residents of more than one county. If necessary, the state
canvass required by section 50.38, or by section 43.63, as the
case may be, shall be delayed with respect to the office or the
nomination to which the recount pertains. The commissioner
shall subsequently inform the state commissioner at the
earliest possible time whether any change in the outcome of the
election in that county or district resulted from the recount.
b. Upon verification that a candidate submitted a
written request for a hand recount in at least one but not
all counties, the state commissioner shall, within six days
following the county canvass of the election, inform each
commissioner of a county in which a recount was requested that
a hand recount shall be performed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 14. Section 50.48, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 9. Before the recount board has issued its
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-10- ss/ns 10/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
final report, the candidate or person who requested the recount
may reach an agreement with the apparent winner to accept the
results of the original canvass by submitting the agreement in
writing to the recount board. Upon receipt of the agreement,
the recount board shall cease its work and report to the county
commissioner that the results of the original canvass are the
official results.
Sec. 15. Section 50.49, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
1. a. A recount for any public measure shall be ordered
by the board of canvassers not later than two days after
the completion of the canvass of voters for the election if
a petition requesting a recount is filed with the county
commissioner of a county in which the question appeared on the
ballot. The petition for a recount shall indicate whether the
recount shall be conducted only using automatic tabulating
equipment or by a hand recount following the use of automatic
tabulating equipment. If a petition requests a hand recount
in one county, the petition shall also request a hand recount
in each county in which the petition is filed. A petition must
be filed by the person submitting the petition in each county
in which the public measure appeared on the ballot. If the
petition is not filed by the person submitting the petition in
each county in which the public measure appeared on the ballot,
a recount shall not be conducted.
b. The petition must be signed by the greater of ten
eligible electors or a number of eligible electors equaling
one percent of the total number of votes cast upon the public
measure in the county. Each person signing the petition must
be a person who was entitled to vote on the public measure in
question or would have been so entitled if registered to vote.
c. Immediately upon receipt of a petition for a recount,
the commissioner shall send a copy of the petition to the
state commissioner by electronic mail. The state commissioner
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-11- ss/ns 11/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
shall confirm that a petition was filed in every county the
public measure appeared on the ballot prior to the convening of
the recount board. The state commissioner shall also verify
whether each petition for a recount included a request for
a hand recount. If the state commissioner verifies that a
petition included a request for a hand recount in at least one
but not all counties, the state commissioner shall, prior to
convening of the recount board, inform each commissioner at
which a hand recount was not requested that a hand recount
shall be performed.
Sec. 16. Section 50.49, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in
lieu thereof the following:
b. Two members who are precinct election officials selected
by the chief judge of the judicial district in which the
canvass occurs at or before the time the board is required to
convene. The members shall be selected consistent with section
49.12.
Sec. 17. Section 50.49, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 18. Section 50.49, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
3. The commissioner shall convene the recount board not
later than 9:00 a.m. on the sixth day following the county
board’s canvass of the election in question.
Sec. 19. Section 50.50, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
50.50 Administrative recounts audits.
1. The commissioner who was responsible for conducting an
election may request an administrative recount audit when the
commissioner is informed or suspects that voting equipment used
in the election malfunctioned or that programming errors may
have affected the outcome of the election, or if the precinct
election officials report counting errors to the commissioner
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-12- ss/ns 12/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
after the conclusion of the canvass of votes in the precinct.
An administrative recount audit shall be conducted by the board
of the special precinct established by section 53.23. Bond
shall not be required for an administrative recount. The
state commissioner may adopt rules for administrative recounts
audits.
2. If the recount board finds that there is an error
in the programming of any voting equipment which may have
affected the outcome of the election for any office or public
measure on the ballot, the recount board shall describe the
errors in its report to the commissioner. The commissioner
shall notify the board of supervisors. The supervisors shall
determine whether to order an administrative recount for any
or all of the offices and public measures on the ballot. Each
political party, as defined in section 43.2, may appoint up
to five observers to witness an audit conducted pursuant to
this section. The observers shall be appointed by the county
chairperson or, if the county chairperson fails to make an
appointment, by the state chairperson. However, if either or
both political parties fail to appoint an observer, the board
may continue with the proceedings.
Sec. 20. Section 50.51, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 21. Section 60.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
60.2 Clerk.
The secretary of state clerk of the supreme court shall be
the clerk of the court, or, in the secretary of state’s clerk
of the supreme court’s absence or inability to act, the clerk
of the supreme court secretary of state.
Sec. 22. Section 61.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
61.2 Clerk.
The secretary of state clerk of the supreme court shall be
the clerk of this court; but if the person holding that office
LSB 1420XD (2) 91
-13- ss/ns 13/18

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
is a party to the contest, the clerk of the supreme court, or,
in case of that person’s absence or inability, the auditor of
state shall be clerk, or, in the clerk of the supreme court’s
absence or inability to act, the secretary of state. If the
person holding the office of secretary of state is a party to
the contest, the auditor of state shall be clerk.
Sec. 23. Section 260C.15, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
5. The votes cast in the election shall be canvassed and
abstracts of the votes cast shall be certified as required by
section 277.20. In each county whose commissioner of elections
is the controlling commissioner for a merged area under section
47.2, the county board of supervisors shall convene on the
second Monday or Tuesday after the day of the election to
canvass the abstracts of votes cast from each county in the
merged area, and declare the results of the voting. The
commissioner shall at once issue certificates of election to
each person declared elected, and shall certify to the merged
area board in substantially the manner prescribed by section
50.27 the result of the voting on any public question submitted
to the voters of the merged area. Members elected to the board
of directors of a merged area shall qualify by taking the oath
of office prescribed in section 277.28.
Sec. 24. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of
immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.